Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNESOTA PAID LEAVE DAY ONE CALL CENTER OPERATIONS.new text end new text begin The commissioner of employment and economic development must ensure that call center operations for the Minnesota paid leave program are fully operational on January 1, 2026, to provide customer service on day one of implementation of the program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end